Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2459
Special administrator; appointed informally; powers and duties.

A special administrator appointed by the registrar in informal proceedings pursuant to section 30-2457(1) has the duty to collect and manage the assets of the estate, to preserve them, to account therefor and to deliver them to the personal representative upon his qualification, or to such other person as shall be legally entitled to receive the same. The special administrator has the power of a personal representative under this code necessary to perform his duties.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 137, UPC § 3-616;

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 14.

A special administrator has the power of a personal representative under the probate code, including the right to partition assets in estates being administered. Znamenacek v. Menke, 210 Neb. 671, 316 N.W.2d 605 (1982).